Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 9. Highways Involving Two or More Towns

§ 790.
Laying out highway or bridge on or near line between two towns.

The selectmen of two adjoining towns may, by agreement, lay out, reclassify, or discontinue a highway on the line between the towns, or erect a bridge over a stream between the towns, if a majority of the selectmen of each town assent.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 791.
Apportioning expenses.

When a highway is or has been previously laid out on the line between the towns, they may agree as to what part of the highway shall be built and repaired and what share of the damages paid by each town.
When a bridge is so erected, they may agree upon the proportion that each town shall pay towards making and keeping it in repair.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 792.
Petition to selectboard.

When the public good or convenience of the inhabitants requires a highway to be laid out, altered, reclassified, or discontinued on, or intersecting the line between two towns, or a bridge across a stream between two towns to be built, persons who are either voters or landowners, and whose number is at least five percent of the voters, of the towns may petition, in writing, the selectboard of either town to lay out, alter, reclassify, or discontinue the highway, or build the bridge.
The selectboard presented with the petition shall notify the selectboard of the other town.
The two boards shall establish a time for hearing, and shall give notice of it.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 793.
Proceedings by selectmen.

The selectmen shall proceed in the same manner as the selectmen of one town in laying out highways or building bridges.
A copy of their findings shall be filed with the clerk of each town within six months from the time of final hearing on the application and their order and surveys shall be recorded in each town clerk’s office and their decision shall be binding on their respective towns.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 794.
Highway near but not on line between towns.

When the public good or the convenience of the inhabitants requires a highway to be laid out, reclassified, or altered so that it shall be near the line between two towns instead of on the town line, on account of the position of the land or nature of the soil over which it is laid, and, when both towns are benefited in a similar manner as though the highway were on the line, the highway may be laid out, reclassified, or altered by the selectboard or the Superior Court, on the report of commissioners. The damages and expenses of making and repairing the highway may be apportioned and the same proceedings shall be followed as provided in case of laying out, reclassifying, and altering highways on the line between two towns.

When the selectboard of the towns are petitioned as provided in this chapter and do not lay out, alter, reclassify, or discontinue a highway on or near a line between two towns, individuals who are either voters or landowners, and whose number is at least five percent of the voters, of the towns may apply to the Superior Court. The court shall inquire and render judgment using the same proceedings as in the case of a highway extending into or through two or more towns. The court may inquire of and receive recommendations from a commissioner or commissioners, but the court shall issue the order. The court shall direct in its order which part of the highway each town shall make, or repair, or reclassify, and what damages shall be paid by each, if a highway is made or altered.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 97.

§ 795.
Town not assessed for highway in another town.

A town shall not be assessed for the expense of building or maintaining any highway in another town, except as provided by this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 796.
Petition by selectmen.

When a bridge is required between two towns and the selectmen of the towns do not agree to build it, the selectmen of either town may petition the Superior Court.
The petition and citation shall be served on one or more of the selectmen of the other town and the same proceedings shall be had as though application had been made by persons who are either voters or landowners, and whose number is at least five percent of the voters.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.